nl: Compatibel koppelingstype: Compatibel met droge koppeling; Niet van toepassing (flexplate/automaat); Trekkoppeling; Drukkoppeling; Compatibel met natte koppeling; Overig
ko: 호환 클러치 유형: 건식 클러치 호환; 해당 없음(플렉스 플레이트/오토매틱); 풀타입 클러치; 푸시타입 클러치; 습식 클러치 호환; 기타
zh-CN: 适配离合器类型: 兼容干式离合器; 不适用（挠性板/自动挡）; 拉式离合器; 推式离合器; 兼容湿式离合器; 其他
ru: Совместимая стойка/штырь для контрабас-кларнета: Совместимо с сухим сцеплением; Неприменимо (маховик-венец/АКПП); Сцепление вытяжного типа; Сцепление нажимного типа; Совместимо с мокрым сцеплением; Другое
zh-TW: 相容的離合器類型: 相容於乾式離合器; 不適用 (飛輪驅動盤/自動變速); 拉式離合器; 推式離合器; 相容於濕式離合器; 其他
vi: Loại ly hợp tương thích: Tương thích ly hợp khô; Không áp dụng (đĩa truyền động/số tự động); Ly hợp loại kéo; Ly hợp loại đẩy; Tương thích ly hợp ướt; Khác
de: Kompatibler Kupplungstyp: Mit Trockenkupplung kompatibel; Nicht zutreffend (Flexplate/Automatik); Gezogene Kupplung; Gedrückte Kupplung; Mit Nasskupplung kompatibel; Sonstige
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ spojky: Kompatibilné so suchou spojkou; Nevzťahuje sa (hnací kotúč/automatická prevodovka); Ťažná spojka; Tlačná spojka; Kompatibilné s mokrou spojkou; Iné
hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip spojke: Kompatibilno sa suhom spojkom; Nije primjenjivo (zamašnjak/automatik); Spojka na povlačenje; Spojka na potisak; Kompatibilno s mokrom spojkom; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibel kopplingstyp: Kompatibel med torrkoppling; Ej tillämpligt (startkrans/automatisk); Koppling av dragtyp; Koppling av trycktyp; Kompatibel med våtkoppling; Annat
da: Kompatibel koblingstype: Kompatibel med tørkobling; Ikke relevant (flexplate/automatgear); Trækkobling; Trykkobling; Kompatibel med vådkobling; Andet
it: Tipo di frizione compatibile: Compatibile con frizione a secco; Non applicabile (disco flessibile/automatico); Frizione a trazione (pull); Frizione a spinta (push); Compatibile con frizione a bagno d'olio; Altro
ja: 互換性のあるクラッチタイプ: 乾式クラッチ対応; 該当なし (フレックスプレート / オートマチック); プル式クラッチ; プッシュ式クラッチ; 湿式クラッチ対応; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de embraiagem compatível: Compatível com embraiagem a seco; Não aplicável (disco de inércia/automático); Embraiagem de tração; Embraiagem de compressão; Compatível com embraiagem banhada a óleo; Outra
fr: Type d’embrayage compatible: Compatible avec embrayage à sec; Non applicable (plaque flexible/automatique); Embrayage tiré; Embrayage poussé; Compatible avec embrayage à bain d’huile; Autre
cs: Kompatibilní typ spojky: Kompatibilní se suchou spojkou; Nelze použít (hnací kotouč / automatická převodovka); Tažná spojka; Tlačná spojka; Kompatibilní s mokrou spojkou; Jiné
pl: Kompatybilny typ sprzęgła: Kompatybilne z suchym sprzęgłem; Nie dotyczy (koło pędne/skrzynia automatyczna); Sprzęgło ciągnione; Sprzęgło pchane; Kompatybilne z mokrym sprzęgłem; Inne
lt-LT: Suderinamas sankabos tipas: Suderinama su sausa sankaba; Netaikoma (lankstusis diskas / automatinė); Traukiamo tipo sankaba; Stumiamo tipo sankaba; Suderinama su šlapia sankaba; Kita
sl-SI: Združljiv tip sklopke: Združljivo s suho sklopko; Ni na voljo (prožna plošča/avtomatik); Vlečna sklopka; Potisna sklopka; Združljivo z mokro sklopko; Drugo
el: Συμβατός τύπος συμπλέκτη: Συμβατό με ξηρό συμπλέκτη; Δεν ισχύει (ελαστικός δίσκος/αυτόματο); Συμπλέκτης τύπου έλξης; Συμπλέκτης τύπου ώθησης; Συμβατό με υγρό συμπλέκτη; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu debriyaj tipi: Kuru kavramayla uyumlu; Geçerli değil (esnek plaka/otomatik); Çekmeli tip kavrama; İtmeli tip kavrama; Islak kavramayla uyumlu; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de embreagem compatível: Compatível com embreagem seca; Não aplicável (placa flexível/automático); Embreagem do tipo puxar; Embreagem do tipo empurrar; Compatível com embreagem úmida; Outro
es: Tipo de embrague compatible: Compatible con embrague en seco; No aplicable (plato flexible/automático); Embrague tipo tracción; Embrague tipo empuje; Compatible con embrague húmedo; Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип съединител: Съвместим със сух съединител; Неприложимо (гъвкав маховик/автоматик); Съединител тип Pull; Съединител тип Push; Съвместим с мокър съединител; Друго
ro-RO: Tip de ambreiaj compatibil: Compatibil cu ambreiaj uscat; Nu se aplică (disc flexibil/automat); Ambreiaj de tip tragere; Ambreiaj de tip împingere; Compatibil cu ambreiaj umed; Altele
en: Compatible clutch type: Dry clutch compatible; Not applicable (flexplate/automatic); Pull-type clutch; Push-type clutch; Wet clutch compatible; Other
nb: Kompatibel clutchtype: Kompatibel med tørrclutch; Ikke relevant (flexplate / automat); Trekkclutch; Trykkclutch; Kompatibel med våtclutch; Annet
hu: Kompatibilis tengelykapcsoló típusa: Száraz kuplunggal kompatibilis; Nem alkalmazható (menesztőtárcsa / automata); Húzó típusú kuplung; Nyomó típusú kuplung; Nedves kuplunggal kompatibilis; Egyéb
th: ประเภทคลัตช์ที่เข้ากันได้: รองรับคลัตช์แห้ง; ไม่สามารถใช้ได้ (จานสะพานเกียร์/อัตโนมัติ); คลัตช์แบบดึง; คลัตช์แบบดัน; รองรับคลัตช์เปียก; อื่นๆ
fi: Yhteensopiva kytkintyyppi: Yhteensopiva kuivakytkimen kanssa; Ei sovelleta (vetolevy/automaatti); Vetotyyppinen kytkin; Työntötyyppinen kytkin; Yhteensopiva märkäkytkimen kanssa; Muu